Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 2

Special Provisions for Mental Health Services to Children

33-8-201. Child with alcohol or drug dependence or developmental disability.

A child who has alcohol dependence, drug dependence, or developmental disability may only receive mental health service or support from the mental health service division if the condition is concurrent with another serious emotional disturbance or mental illness.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Prior to the deletion and replacement of chapter 8 in the revision of title 33, by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001, former chapter 8, parts 1-5, were transferred to title 68, ch. 24, parts 1-5, respectively, in 1993. See the Compiler's Notes under § 68-24-101.

33-8-202. Rights of child sixteen (16) years of age or older.

If a child with serious emotional disturbance or mental illness is sixteen (16) years of age or older, the child has the same rights as an adult with respect to outpatient and inpatient mental health treatment, medication decisions, confidential information, and participation in conflict resolution procedures under this title except as provided in part 3 of this chapter, or as otherwise expressly provided in this title. If the child's parent, legal guardian, legal custodian, or treating professional believes that the child's decision to terminate treatment, other than a request for discharge under chapter 6, part 2 of this title, will have severe adverse effects on the child, the conflict resolution procedures under chapter 2, part 6 of this title shall be used.

An outpatient facility or professional may provide treatment and rehabilitation without obtaining the consent of the child's parent, legal guardian, or legal custodian.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

33-8-203. Parents, custodians and guardians to participate in child's outpatient treatment plan.

Parents, legal custodians, and legal guardians shall participate in mandatory outpatient treatment discharge planning and do what is necessary to carry out the child's plan.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.